Tennessee, session 114, SB0408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-20-107(h), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(h)
(1) A governmental entity or local board of education shall not extend the
immunity granted by this chapter to independent school bus contractors in
performing or providing school-related transportation services to a local board of
education.
(2) The contract or agreement between a local board of education and an
independent school bus contractor must require sufficient limits for tort liability
exposures as required by applicable law related to performing or providing
school-related transportation services to the local board of education by the
contractor. Evidence of such coverage may include, without limitation, a
certificate of insurance from the provider of insurance coverage that has the local
board of education listed as an additional insured.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0408
001796
- 1 -